src/orthography/standard-to-thirties.xfscript
! =====================================!
! Orthographic converter for Hill Mari thirties orth !
! =====================================!

! Explanation for orthographies (perhaps to be revised)
! In the period before 1938, palatalisation was written according to Mari and not
! Russian rules, thus, we had ъэ and ьэ for later е.
! (= "thirties")
! In the period 1939-1994, front vowel in non-initial syllables were written as 
! back vowels whenever the word had a front vowel to the left (like if Fi. "täälla").
! This spellrelax file thus takes all back vowels in a front context and allows
! them to be interpreted as front.
! (= "eighties")
! The current orthography writes front vowels throughout.
! Shibboleth word: päshä spelled as päsha in the eighties since 
! (= "standard")

! This program translates text written in the orthographies
! of the 20s and 30s (here called "thirties" into modern orthography

echo <<defining Cns and Vow...>>


define Vow [ а | е | и | э | я | о | у | ё | ю | ӓ | ӧ | ӱ | ӹ | А | Е | И | Э | Я | О | У | Ё | Ю | Ӓ | Ӧ | Ӱ | Ӹ ] ; 

define Vow2 [ а | э | у | А | Э | У ] ; 

define FrontVow [ ӓ | ӧ | ӹ | Ӓ | Ӧ | Ӹ ] ;

define Cns  [ б | в | г | д | ж | з | й | к | л | м | н | ҥ | п | р | с | т | ф | х | ц | ч | ш | щ | 
              Б | В | Г | Д | Ж | З | Й | К | Л | М | Н | Ҥ | П | Р | С | Т | Ф | Х | Ц | Ч | Ш | Щ ] ;


define Sign [ ъ | ь | Ъ | Ь ] ;

define Segm [ Sign | Cns | Vow ] ;
define FrontSegm [ Sign | Cns | FrontVow ] ;

echo << Rules>>

echo << We here do pre-1938 >>

define CnsJV й -> ъ й , Й -> Ъ Й || Cns _ Vow2 ;  # пӧрйэҥ -> пӧръйэҥ

define JE  й э -> е , ь э -> е , Й [Э|э] -> Е , Ь Э -> Е ; # пӧръйэҥ -> пӧръеҥ
define JA  й а -> я , ь [а|ӓ]  -> я , Й [А|а] -> Я , Ь [А|Ӓ] -> Я ;
define JU  й у -> ю , ь у -> ю , Й [У|у] -> Ю , Ь У -> Ю ;

define CnsE [ э -> е , Э -> Е || Cns _ ] ;
		    
define NG [ ҥ -> н г , Ҥ -> Н Г ] ;


echo << Combining >>

read regex [ CnsJV
.o. JE 
.o. JA 
.o. JU
.o. CnsE
.o. NG ] ;
